Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1829.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1606-C. Annual evaluation.(a) Compliance evaluation.--Not later than November 1 of each year, a school entity shall perform an annual evaluation of compliance with the regulations under 34 CFR 106.41 (relating to athletics) and report to the department the findings of the evaluation regarding the preceding school year or academic year. A school entity shall publish a comprehensive report of the evaluation on an annual basis and post the report on the 12345678910111213141516171819 publicly accessible Internet website of the school entity.(b) Duty of department.--The department shall:(1) Develop a report card system, on an A-F letter scale, to assess each school entity's performance under subsection (a) and the provision of equal opportunities to students of each race and gender based on the information disclosed to the department under section 1604-C.(2) Annually update a report card assessing the performance of each school entity based on the system developed under paragraph (1) and publish the report card on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.(c) Requirements.--The report card developed under subsection (b) shall:(1) Be concise.(2) Provide a letter grade based on equitable participation and spending for each secondary sport offered by a school entity.(3) Be presented in an understandable and uniform format and, to the extent practicable, in a language that a parent or legal guardian can understand.(d) Publication.--A school entity shall publish the report card developed by the department under subsection (b) on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department and notify each parent or legal guardian of the report card's assessment of the school entity's performance on an annual basis.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1829PN2254 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627